Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.270

Noxious weed control boards—Authority to obtain insurance or surety bonds.

Each noxious weed control board may obtain such insurance or surety bonds, or both with such limits as they may deem reasonable for the purpose of protecting their officials and employees against liability for personal or bodily injuries and property damage arising from their acts or omissions while performing or in good faith purporting to perform their official duties.

[ 1987 c 438 s 34; 1974 ex.s. c 143 s 5.]